Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1232
Vessel; carry and exhibit lights; when.

Every vessel in all weather from sunset to sunrise shall carry and exhibit the lights prescribed by sections 37-1233 to 37-1238 when underway, and during such time no other lights which may be mistaken for those prescribed shall be exhibited.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 32.